District of Columbia statutes.
32-1107

Powers of administration and enforcement.

(a)

Except as provided in §§ 32-1105, 32-1106, and 32-1117, the Mayor shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter and may, consistent with the provisions of this chapter, delegate any power or authority to a designee of the Mayor.

(b)

The Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(c)

The Mayor shall provide consultative services for employers pursuant to rules promulgated by the Mayor.

(d)

The Mayor shall, either directly or through grants or contracts:

(1)

Conduct educational and training programs to ensure the availability of skilled manpower necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, including short-term training of present employees;

(2)

Establish and conduct programs for the education and training of employers and employees in the recognition, avoidance, and prevention of unsafe and unhealthful conditions in workplaces subject to this chapter;

(3)

Consult with employers, employees, and their respective organizations on the development and staffing of preventive programs; and

(4)

Conduct research and undertake demonstrations relating to occupational safety and health matters.

(e)

The Mayor shall, to the extent required by the Federal Act, submit reports to the Secretary of Labor in the form and including any information that the Secretary of Labor may require.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-186, § 8, 35 DCR 8250
1981 Ed., § 36-1207.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-186, the “District of Columbia Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1988”, see Mayor’s Order 89-121, May 31, 1989.
Section effective: Section 26 (a) of D.C. Law 7-186 (§ 32-1124(a)) provided that §§ 36-1202, 36-1203, 36-1205 to 36-1223 (§§ 32-1102, 32-1103, 32-1105 to 32-1123, 2001 Ed.), and the repeal of subchapter II of Chapter 2 of Title 36 (Chapter 8 of Title 32, 2001 Ed.) shall apply 2 years after approval of the plan by the Secretary.